Utah statutes.
71-11-10.   Hobby promotion -- Sales of articles manufactured by residents -- Proceeds to residents.

(1)  Each home shall promote hobbies designed to improve the general welfare and mental condition of the residents.

(2)  The home may provide limited funds to initiate a hobby program, but shall limit the program to those hobbies that, in its judgment, will be self sustaining.

(3)  The department may enter into contracts with federal or state agencies or private concerns for the receipt of articles manufactured by residents of the homes.

(4)  Proceeds generated by hobbies shall be used to pay for materials.  Any excess proceeds shall be paid to the individual veterans who produced the articles.



Amended by Chapter 173, 2007 General Session

